Wisconsin, session 2025, SB614.
do enact as follows:SB614,11Section 1. 16.3087 of the statutes is created to read:SB614,2,3216.3087 Pay for performance grant requirements. (1) Definitions. In 3this section:SB614,2,44(a) “AIDS” means acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.SB614,2,95(b) “Base year” means the calendar year occurring within the 5 years 6immediately preceding the year in which a grant recipient is first awarded an 7eligible grant subject to this section during which the grant recipient’s program for 8which the grant recipient received the eligible grant demonstrated the most 9successful outcomes, as determined by the department.SB614,2,1110(c) “Eligible grant” means a grant awarded under s. 16.306 (2), 16.307 (1), 1116.308 (2) (a), or 16.3085 (2).SB614,2,1212(d) “Grant recipient” means any of the following:SB614,2,14131. An organization specified in s. 16.306 (1) (d) or (e) that receives a grant 14under s. 16.306 (2).SB614,2,15152. An organization that receives a grant under s. 16.307 (1).SB614,3,213. An organization specified in s. 16.308 (1) (b) 4. or 7. that receives a grant 2under s. 16.308 (2) (a).SB614,3,334. A shelter facility that receives a grant under s. 16.3085 (2).SB614,3,54(e) “HIV” means any strain of human immunodeficiency virus, which causes 5AIDS.SB614,3,96(2) Performance payments. (a) Except as provided in par. (b), for each 7eligible grant the department awards to a grant recipient, the department shall 8withhold between 10 and 50 percent of the amount of the eligible grant for at least 99 months after the award, subject to par. (c).SB614,3,1110(b) Paragraph (a) first applies to the 2nd eligible grant awarded to the same 11grant recipient after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date].SB614,3,1512(c) After expiration of the 9-month period specified in par. (a), the department 13may pay the amount of an eligible grant withheld under par. (a) only if the grant 14recipient demonstrates that it has met one or more of the following performance 15objectives, as determined by the department:SB614,3,18161. Increased the number of homeless individuals and families securing 17continued housing for longer than 9 months after participation in a program offered 18by the grant recipient compared to the base year.SB614,3,22192. Increased the number of homeless individuals securing part-time or full-20time employment and an increase in earned income, as defined in 26 USC 32 (c) (2), 21after participation in a program offered by the grant recipient compared to the base 22year.SB614,4,2233. Reduced the number of homeless individuals and families returning to 1homelessness after participation in a program offered by the grant recipient 2compared to the base year.SB614,4,73(d) For purposes of par. (c) and to the extent permitted under federal law, the 4department shall give priority to grant recipients awarded grants under ss. 16.306 5(2) and 16.3085 (2) that have made demonstrable commitments, as determined by 6the department, to improving outcomes in connection with the performance 7objectives specified in par. (c).SB614,4,138(e) Moneys encumbered for an eligible grant that the department withholds 9under par. (a) and that the department does not pay to the grant recipient under 10par. (c) due to the grant recipient’s failure to satisfy one or more of the performance 11objectives specified in par. (c) may be reallocated as additional grant moneys to 12other grant recipients that satisfy one or more of the performance objectives 13specified in par. (c).SB614,4,1914(3) Reporting requirements. For each eligible grant the department 15awards to a grant recipient, the grant recipient shall, no less than 9 months and no 16more than 12 months after the award, submit to the department a report that 17includes all of the following information about the grant recipient, the grant 18recipient’s program supported by the grant, and the individuals who receive 19services or housing from the grant recipient as a result of the grant:SB614,5,220(a) The grant recipient’s homeless management information system 21organization identification number provided by the federal department of housing 22and urban development through the grant recipient’s continuum of care. If the 23grant recipient does not have a homeless management information system 1identification number, the department shall assign a unique identification number 2to the grant recipient.SB614,5,33(b) The grant recipient’s legal name.SB614,5,94(c) The program’s homeless management information system project 5identification number provided by the federal department of housing and urban 6development through the grant recipient’s continuum of care. If the program does 7not have a homeless management information system project identification 8number, the department shall assign a unique identification number to the 9program.SB614,5,1010(d) The name of the program.SB614,5,1211(e) The first day on which the program provided or will provide services or 12housing.SB614,5,1413(f) The last day on which the program provided or is expected to provide 14services or housing, if known.SB614,5,1615(g) The grant recipient’s 6-character continuum of care code published by the 16federal department of housing and urban development, if applicable.SB614,5,1917(h) The geographic code provided by the federal department of housing and 18urban development associated with the location of the program’s principal site, if 19applicable.SB614,5,2320(i) The street address of the program’s principal site, or, for a scattered-site 21program, the address in which most the program’s clients are housed. For a tenant-22based scattered-site program or victim service provider, the administrative street 23address may be used.SB614,5,2424(j) Other street addresses of the program, if applicable.SB614,6,41(k) The city in which the program’s principal site is located, or, for a scattered-2site program, the city in which most of the program’s clients are housed. For a 3tenant-based scattered-site program or victim service provider, the administrative 4city may be used.SB614,6,65(L) The state in which the program’s principal site is located, provided as a 2-6letter abbreviation.SB614,6,107(m) The zip code of the program’s principal site, or, for a scattered-site 8program, the zip code in which most of the program’s clients are housed. For a 9tenant-based scattered-site program or victim service provider, the administrative 10zip code may be used.SB614,6,1211(n) One of the following geography types, corresponding to the federal 12department of housing and urban development crosswalk of zip codes:SB614,6,13131. Urban.SB614,6,14142. Suburban.SB614,6,15153. Rural.SB614,6,1716(o) All of the following information about each individual that receives 17services or housing from the grant recipient as a result of the grant:SB614,6,20181. The full first name or given name used by the individual. The individual’s 19preferred name may be provided in quotations following the individual’s full first 20name.SB614,6,21212. The full middle name or names, if any, used by the individual. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb614 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb614 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB614 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB614 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB614: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting